Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-187
Nonbeverage licensee forbidden to give or sell alcoholic liquor; violation; penalty.

No nonbeverage user shall sell, give away, or otherwise dispose of any alcoholic liquor, purchased under his or her license as such nonbeverage user, in any form fit for beverage purposes. Any nonbeverage user who violates this section shall pay to the commission, for the use of the General Fund, the sum of three dollars and seventy-five cents for each gallon of alcoholic liquor so diverted, and in addition thereto shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 53-1,100.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 57, p. 408;

Laws 1939, c. 64, § 2, p. 271;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-357;

R.S.1943, § 53-187;

Laws 1959, c. 250, § 3, p. 877;

Laws 1965, c. 319, § 4, p. 910;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 29.